Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.220

County auditor—Public notice of availability of services.

The county auditor shall provide public notice of the availability of registration and voting aids, assistance to elderly and disabled persons, and procedures for voting calculated to reach elderly and disabled persons not later than public notice of the closing of registration for a primary or election.

[ 2011 c 10 s 7; 2003 c 111 s 135; 1999 c 298 s 18; 1985 c 205 s 10. Formerly RCW 29.57.140.]

NOTES:

Notice to registered poll voters—Elections by mail—2011 c 10: See note following RCW 29A.04.008.

Effective dates—1985 c 205: "(1) Sections 1, 2, and 13 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately.

(2) Sections 15 and 16 of this act shall take effect as provided by Article II, section 1(c) of the state Constitution.

(3) Sections 3 through 12 and 14 of this act shall take effect on January 1, 1986." [ 1985 c 205 s 18.]